Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.280

City contracts to obtain sheriff's office law enforcement services—Rules and regulations.

In addition to its other duties prescribed by law, the civil service commission shall make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to provide for the orderly integration of employees of a city or town who shall transfer to the county sheriff's office pursuant to RCW 41.14.250, 41.14.260, and 41.14.270.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 48 s 4.]